SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0239 Y 28
SFX 0239 0 ch .
SFX 0239 0 chmoj .
SFX 0239 0 chmy .
SFX 0239 0 chu .
SFX 0239 0 cy .
SFX 0239 0 j .
SFX 0239 0 ja .
SFX 0239 0 jtaj .
SFX 0239 0 jtej .
SFX 0239 0 jće .
SFX 0239 0 li .
SFX 0239 0 m .
SFX 0239 0 moj .
SFX 0239 0 my .
SFX 0239 0 nje .
SFX 0239 0 taj .
SFX 0239 0 tej .
SFX 0239 0 ty .
SFX 0239 0 ć .
SFX 0239 0 će .
SFX 0239 0 ł .
SFX 0239 0 ła .
SFX 0239 0 ło .
SFX 0239 0 łoj .
SFX 0239 0 š .
SFX 0239 0 štaj .
SFX 0239 0 štej .
SFX 0239 0 šće .

SFX 0240 Y 31
SFX 0240 0 a .
SFX 0240 0 ach .
SFX 0240 0 achmoj .
SFX 0240 0 achmy .
SFX 0240 0 achu .
SFX 0240 0 acy .
SFX 0240 0 am .
SFX 0240 0 any .
SFX 0240 0 ał .
SFX 0240 0 ała .
SFX 0240 0 ało .
SFX 0240 0 ałoj .
SFX 0240 0 eli .
SFX 0240 0 enje .
SFX 0240 0 eć .
SFX 0240 0 eš .
SFX 0240 0 eše .
SFX 0240 0 eštaj .
SFX 0240 0 eštej .
SFX 0240 0 ešće .
SFX 0240 0 i .
SFX 0240 0 imoj .
SFX 0240 0 imy .
SFX 0240 0 itaj .
SFX 0240 0 itej .
SFX 0240 0 iće .
SFX 0240 0 moj .
SFX 0240 0 my .
SFX 0240 0 taj .
SFX 0240 0 tej .
SFX 0240 0 će .

SFX 0241 Y 30
SFX 0241 ić owach ..
SFX 0241 ić owachmoj ..
SFX 0241 ić owachmy ..
SFX 0241 ić owachu ..
SFX 0241 ić owacy ..
SFX 0241 ić owali ..
SFX 0241 ić owanje ..
SFX 0241 ić owany ..
SFX 0241 ić ować ..
SFX 0241 ić ował ..
SFX 0241 ić owała ..
SFX 0241 ić owało ..
SFX 0241 ić owałoj ..
SFX 0241 ić owaše ..
SFX 0241 ić owaštaj ..
SFX 0241 ić owaštej ..
SFX 0241 ić owašće ..
SFX 0241 ić uj ..
SFX 0241 ić uja ..
SFX 0241 ić uje ..
SFX 0241 ić ujemoj ..
SFX 0241 ić ujemy ..
SFX 0241 ić ujetaj ..
SFX 0241 ić ujetej ..
SFX 0241 ić ujeće ..
SFX 0241 ić uješ ..
SFX 0241 ić ujtaj ..
SFX 0241 ić ujtej ..
SFX 0241 ić uju ..
SFX 0241 ić ujće ..

SFX 0242 Y 29
SFX 0242 ž zy .
SFX 0242 ž zych .
SFX 0242 ž zychmoj .
SFX 0242 ž zychmy .
SFX 0242 ž zychu .
SFX 0242 ž zyli .
SFX 0242 ž zymoj .
SFX 0242 ž zymy .
SFX 0242 ž zytaj .
SFX 0242 ž zytej .
SFX 0242 ž zyć .
SFX 0242 ž zyće .
SFX 0242 ž zył .
SFX 0242 ž zyła .
SFX 0242 ž zyło .
SFX 0242 ž zyłoj .
SFX 0242 ž zyš .
SFX 0242 ž zyštaj .
SFX 0242 ž zyštej .
SFX 0242 ž zyšće .
SFX 0242 ž ža .
SFX 0242 ž žacy .
SFX 0242 ž ženje .
SFX 0242 ž ženy .
SFX 0242 ž žmy .
SFX 0242 ž žtaj .
SFX 0242 ž žtej .
SFX 0242 ž žu .
SFX 0242 ž žće .

SFX 0243 Y 32
SFX 0243 c kli .
SFX 0243 c kni .
SFX 0243 c knitaj .
SFX 0243 c knitej .
SFX 0243 c kniće .
SFX 0243 c knje .
SFX 0243 c knjemoj .
SFX 0243 c knjemy .
SFX 0243 c knjenje .
SFX 0243 c knjeny .
SFX 0243 c knjetaj .
SFX 0243 c knjetej .
SFX 0243 c knjeće .
SFX 0243 c knješ .
SFX 0243 c knu .
SFX 0243 c kny .
SFX 0243 c knych .
SFX 0243 c knychmoj .
SFX 0243 c knychmy .
SFX 0243 c knychu .
SFX 0243 c knyštaj .
SFX 0243 c knyštej .
SFX 0243 c knyšće .
SFX 0243 c kł .
SFX 0243 c kła .
SFX 0243 c kłe .
SFX 0243 c kło .
SFX 0243 c kłoj .
SFX 0243 c kń .
SFX 0243 c kńtaj .
SFX 0243 c kńtej .
SFX 0243 c kńće .

SFX 0244 Y 30
SFX 0244 0 ch .
SFX 0244 0 chmoj .
SFX 0244 0 chmy .
SFX 0244 0 chu .
SFX 0244 0 j .
SFX 0244 0 ja .
SFX 0244 0 jacy .
SFX 0244 0 je .
SFX 0244 0 jemoj .
SFX 0244 0 jemy .
SFX 0244 0 jetaj .
SFX 0244 0 jetej .
SFX 0244 0 jeće .
SFX 0244 0 jtaj .
SFX 0244 0 jtej .
SFX 0244 0 jće .
SFX 0244 0 li .
SFX 0244 0 tu .
SFX 0244 0 ty .
SFX 0244 0 ć .
SFX 0244 0 će .
SFX 0244 0 ćeš .
SFX 0244 0 ł .
SFX 0244 0 ła .
SFX 0244 0 łe .
SFX 0244 0 ło .
SFX 0244 0 łoj .
SFX 0244 0 štaj .
SFX 0244 0 štej .
SFX 0244 0 šće .

SFX 0245 Y 28
SFX 0245 ehń ahnje ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnjemoj ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnjemy ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnjetaj ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnjetej ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnjeće ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnješ ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnu ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahny ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnych ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnychmoj ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnychmy ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnychu ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnyli ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnyć ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnył ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnyła ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnyło ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnyłoj ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnyštaj ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnyštej ...
SFX 0245 ehń ahnyšće ...
SFX 0245 ehń ehnjacy ...
SFX 0245 ehń ehnjenje ...
SFX 0245 ehń ehnjeny ...
SFX 0245 ehń ehńtaj ...
SFX 0245 ehń ehńtej ...
SFX 0245 ehń ehńće ...

SFX 0246 Y 29
SFX 0246 ń njacy .
SFX 0246 ń nje .
SFX 0246 ń njemoj .
SFX 0246 ń njemy .
SFX 0246 ń njenje .
SFX 0246 ń njeny .
SFX 0246 ń njetaj .
SFX 0246 ń njetej .
SFX 0246 ń njeće .
SFX 0246 ń nu .
SFX 0246 ń ny .
SFX 0246 ń nych .
SFX 0246 ń nychmoj .
SFX 0246 ń nychmy .
SFX 0246 ń nychu .
SFX 0246 ń nyješ .
SFX 0246 ń nyju .
SFX 0246 ń nyli .
SFX 0246 ń nyć .
SFX 0246 ń nył .
SFX 0246 ń nyła .
SFX 0246 ń nyło .
SFX 0246 ń nyłoj .
SFX 0246 ń nyštaj .
SFX 0246 ń nyštej .
SFX 0246 ń nyšće .
SFX 0246 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0246 ń ńtej .
SFX 0246 ń ńće .

SFX 0247 Y 26
SFX 0247 a ach .
SFX 0247 a achmoj .
SFX 0247 a achmy .
SFX 0247 a achu .
SFX 0247 a acy .
SFX 0247 a amoj .
SFX 0247 a amy .
SFX 0247 a any .
SFX 0247 a ataj .
SFX 0247 a atej .
SFX 0247 a ał .
SFX 0247 a ała .
SFX 0247 a ało .
SFX 0247 a ałoj .
SFX 0247 a ej .
SFX 0247 a eja .
SFX 0247 a ejtaj .
SFX 0247 a ejtej .
SFX 0247 a ejće .
SFX 0247 a eli .
SFX 0247 a enje .
SFX 0247 a eć .
SFX 0247 a eće .
SFX 0247 a eštaj .
SFX 0247 a eštej .
SFX 0247 a ešće .

SFX 0248 Y 25
SFX 0248 a ach .
SFX 0248 a achmoj .
SFX 0248 a achmy .
SFX 0248 a achu .
SFX 0248 a ali .
SFX 0248 a anje .
SFX 0248 a any .
SFX 0248 a ać .
SFX 0248 a ał .
SFX 0248 a ała .
SFX 0248 a ałe .
SFX 0248 a ało .
SFX 0248 a ałoj .
SFX 0248 a aštaj .
SFX 0248 a aštej .
SFX 0248 a ašće .
SFX 0248 a i .
SFX 0248 a imoj .
SFX 0248 a imy .
SFX 0248 a itaj .
SFX 0248 a itej .
SFX 0248 a iće .
SFX 0248 a iš .
SFX 0248 a ja .
SFX 0248 a ju .

SFX 0249 Y 29
SFX 0249 a ach .
SFX 0249 a achmoj .
SFX 0249 a achmy .
SFX 0249 a achu .
SFX 0249 a ali .
SFX 0249 a aty .
SFX 0249 a ać .
SFX 0249 a aće .
SFX 0249 a ał .
SFX 0249 a ała .
SFX 0249 a ałe .
SFX 0249 a ało .
SFX 0249 a ałoj .
SFX 0249 a ej .
SFX 0249 a eja .
SFX 0249 a eji .
SFX 0249 a ejimoj .
SFX 0249 a ejimy .
SFX 0249 a ejitaj .
SFX 0249 a ejitej .
SFX 0249 a ejiće .
SFX 0249 a ejiš .
SFX 0249 a ejtaj .
SFX 0249 a ejtej .
SFX 0249 a eju .
SFX 0249 a ejće .
SFX 0249 a eštaj .
SFX 0249 a eštej .
SFX 0249 a ešće .

SFX 0250 Y 30
SFX 0250 0 ch .
SFX 0250 0 chmoj .
SFX 0250 0 chmy .
SFX 0250 0 chu .
SFX 0250 0 li .
SFX 0250 0 nje .
SFX 0250 0 njemoj .
SFX 0250 0 njemy .
SFX 0250 0 njetaj .
SFX 0250 0 njetej .
SFX 0250 0 njeće .
SFX 0250 0 nješ .
SFX 0250 0 nu .
SFX 0250 0 ty .
SFX 0250 0 ć .
SFX 0250 0 će .
SFX 0250 0 ł .
SFX 0250 0 ła .
SFX 0250 0 łe .
SFX 0250 0 ło .
SFX 0250 0 łoj .
SFX 0250 0 ń .
SFX 0250 0 ńmoj .
SFX 0250 0 ńmy .
SFX 0250 0 ńtaj .
SFX 0250 0 ńtej .
SFX 0250 0 ńće .
SFX 0250 0 štaj .
SFX 0250 0 štej .
SFX 0250 0 šće .

SFX 0251 Y 28
SFX 0251 0 ch .
SFX 0251 0 chmoj .
SFX 0251 0 chmy .
SFX 0251 0 chu .
SFX 0251 0 dźa .
SFX 0251 0 dźany .
SFX 0251 0 dźał .
SFX 0251 0 dźała .
SFX 0251 0 dźałe .
SFX 0251 0 dźało .
SFX 0251 0 dźałoj .
SFX 0251 0 dźeli .
SFX 0251 0 dźenje .
SFX 0251 0 m .
SFX 0251 0 moj .
SFX 0251 0 my .
SFX 0251 0 s .
SFX 0251 0 staj .
SFX 0251 0 stej .
SFX 0251 0 sće .
SFX 0251 0 z .
SFX 0251 0 ztaj .
SFX 0251 0 ztej .
SFX 0251 0 zće .
SFX 0251 0 š .
SFX 0251 0 štaj .
SFX 0251 0 štej .
SFX 0251 0 šće .

SFX 0252 Y 29
SFX 0252 0 ch .
SFX 0252 0 chmoj .
SFX 0252 0 chmy .
SFX 0252 0 chu .
SFX 0252 0 dźa .
SFX 0252 0 dźany .
SFX 0252 0 dźał .
SFX 0252 0 dźała .
SFX 0252 0 dźałe .
SFX 0252 0 dźało .
SFX 0252 0 dźałoj .
SFX 0252 0 dźeli .
SFX 0252 0 dźenje .
SFX 0252 0 dźeć .
SFX 0252 0 m .
SFX 0252 0 moj .
SFX 0252 0 my .
SFX 0252 0 s .
SFX 0252 0 staj .
SFX 0252 0 stej .
SFX 0252 0 sće .
SFX 0252 0 z .
SFX 0252 0 ztaj .
SFX 0252 0 ztej .
SFX 0252 0 zće .
SFX 0252 0 š .
SFX 0252 0 štaj .
SFX 0252 0 štej .
SFX 0252 0 šće .
