SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
dopušć/0240
dopušćić/0241
dopředa/0239
doraž/0242
dorjec/0243
doros/0244
dorozpředa/0239
doschń/0246
dosehń/0245
dosmja/0247
dospa/0248
dosta/0249
dowotwož/0242
dowož/0242
dowě/0252
dósta/0250
nakaž/0242
naraž/0242
narjec/0243
naspa/0248
nasta/0249
nasta/0250
nawož/0242
njedopředa/0239
njedoraž/0242
njedorjec/0243
njedorozpředa/0239
njedospa/0248
njedosta/0249
njedowotwož/0242
njedowož/0242
njedowě/0251
njedósta/0250
njenakaž/0242
njenaraž/0242
njenarjec/0243
njenaspa/0248
njenasta/0249
njenasta/0250
njenawož/0242
njepodraž/0242
njepohrož/0242
njepokaž/0242
njeporaž/0242
njepospa/0248
njeposta/0249
njepowož/0242
njepowě/0251
njepozasta/0250
njepołaž/0242
njepředewza/0239
njepřeraž/0242
njepřespa/0248
njepřesta/0249
njepřesta/0250
njepřewda/0239
njepřewož/0242
njepřiraž/0242
njepřista/0250
njepřiwda/0239
njepřiwož/0242
njerjec/0243
njerozka/0239
njerozraž/0242
njerozwož/0242
njeskaž/0242
njespředa/0239
njespřida/0239
njesta/0250
njewobraž/0242
njewobsta/0249
njewohrož/0242
njewosta/0250
njewotesta/0239
njewotewza/0239
njewotkaž/0242
njewotraž/0242
njewotrjec/0243
njewotsta/0249
njewotwož/0242
njewukaž/0242
njewuraž/0242
njewuspa/0248
njewusta/0249
njewuwosta/0250
njewuwož/0242
njezaraž/0242
njezaspa/0248
njezasta/0250
njezawosta/0250
njezawož/0242
njezraž/0242
njezwotwož/0242
njezwož/0242
podraž/0242
podros/0244
pohrož/0242
pokaž/0242
poraž/0242
posmja/0247
pospa/0248
posta/0249
powož/0242
powě/0252
pozasta/0250
połaž/0242
předewza/0239
přeraž/0242
přesehń/0245
přespa/0248
přesta/0249
přesta/0250
přewda/0239
přewož/0242
přiraž/0242
přista/0250
přiwda/0239
přiwož/0242
rjec/0243
rozesmja/0247
rozestajić/0241
rozpja/0247
rozraž/0242
rozsehń/0245
rozwož/0242
sehń/0245
skaž/0242
spředa/0239
spřećelić/0241
spřida/0239
sta/0250
wobhrodźić/0241
wobraž/0242
wobsehń/0245
wobsta/0249
wohrož/0242
wosta/0250
wotewza/0239
wotkaž/0242
wotraž/0242
wotrjec/0243
wotsta/0249
wotwož/0242
wukaž/0242
wuprehń/0245
wupłaćić/0241
wuraž/0242
wusehń/0245
wusmehń/0245
wuspa/0248
wusta/0249
wuwosta/0250
wuwož/0242
zaprajić/0241
zaprehń/0245
zaraž/0242
zasehń/0245
zaspa/0248
zasta/0250
zastajić/0241
zaswěćić/0241
zawosta/0250
zawož/0242
zawróćić/0241
zraž/0242
zwotwož/0242
zwož/0242
